test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-subst-2tav-i_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - jävri:
    jävri+N+Sg+Nom:   jävri
    jävri+N+Sg+Gen:   jäävri
    jävri+N+Sg+Ill:   jáávrán
    jävri+N+Sg+Loc:   jäävrist
    jävri+N+Sg+Com:   javrijn
    jävri+N+Sg+Abe:   jävrittáá
    jävri+N+Ess:      jävrin
    jävri+N+Pl+Nom:   jäävrih
    jävri+N+Pl+Gen:  [jaavrij, javrij]
    jävri+N+Pl+Acc:   jaavrijd
    jävri+N+Pl+Ill:   javrijd
    jävri+N+Pl+Loc:   jaavrijn
    jävri+N+Pl+Com:   javrijguin
    jävri+N+Pl+Abe:   javrijttáá

  Noun - täsni:
    täsni+N+Sg+Nom:   täsni
    täsni+N+Sg+Gen:   tääsni
    täsni+N+Sg+Ill:   táásnán
    täsni+N+Sg+Loc:   tääsnist
    täsni+N+Sg+Com:   tasnijn
    täsni+N+Sg+Abe:   täsnittáá
    täsni+N+Ess:      täsnin
    täsni+N+Pl+Nom:   tääsnih
    täsni+N+Pl+Gen:  [taasnij, tasnij]
    täsni+N+Pl+Acc:   taasnijd
    täsni+N+Pl+Ill:   tasnijd
    täsni+N+Pl+Loc:   taasnijn
    täsni+N+Pl+Com:   tasnijguin
    täsni+N+Pl+Abe:   tasnijttáá

  Noun - njälmi:
    njälmi+N+Sg+Nom:   njälmi
    njälmi+N+Sg+Gen:   njäälmi
    njälmi+N+Sg+Ill:   njáálmán
    njälmi+N+Sg+Loc:   njäälmist
    njälmi+N+Sg+Com:   njalmijn
    njälmi+N+Sg+Abe:   njälmittáá
    njälmi+N+Ess:      njälmin
    njälmi+N+Pl+Nom:   njäälmih
    njälmi+N+Pl+Gen:  [njaalmij, njalmij]
    njälmi+N+Pl+Acc:   njaalmijd
    njälmi+N+Pl+Ill:   njalmijd
    njälmi+N+Pl+Loc:   njaalmijn
    njälmi+N+Pl+Com:   njalmijguin
    njälmi+N+Pl+Abe:   njalmijttáá

  Noun - lähji:
    lähji+N+Sg+Nom:   lähji
    lähji+N+Sg+Gen:   läähji
    lähji+N+Sg+Ill:   lááhján
    lähji+N+Sg+Loc:   läähjist
    lähji+N+Sg+Com:   lahjijn
    lähji+N+Sg+Abe:   lähjittáá
    lähji+N+Ess:      lähjin
    lähji+N+Pl+Nom:   läähjih
    lähji+N+Pl+Gen:  [laahjij, lahjij]
    lähji+N+Pl+Acc:   laahjijd
    lähji+N+Pl+Ill:   lahjijd
    lähji+N+Pl+Loc:   laahijin
    lähji+N+Pl+Com:   lahjijguin
    lähji+N+Pl+Abe:   lahjijttáá

  Noun - säppi:
    säppi+N+Sg+Nom:   säppi
    säppi+N+Sg+Gen:   sääpi
    säppi+N+Sg+Ill:   sáápán
    säppi+N+Sg+Loc:   sääpist
    säppi+N+Sg+Com:   sappijn
    säppi+N+Sg+Abe:   säpittáá
    säppi+N+Ess:      säppin
    säppi+N+Pl+Nom:   sääpih
    säppi+N+Pl+Gen:  [saapij, sapij]
    säppi+N+Pl+Acc:   saapijd
    säppi+N+Pl+Ill:   sappijd
    säppi+N+Pl+Loc:   saapijn
    säppi+N+Pl+Com:   sapijguin
    säppi+N+Pl+Abe:   sapijttáá

  Noun - välli:
    välli+N+Sg+Nom:   välli
    välli+N+Sg+Gen:   vääli
    välli+N+Sg+Ill:   váálán
    välli+N+Sg+Loc:   väälist
    välli+N+Sg+Com:   vallijn
    välli+N+Sg+Abe:   välittáá
    välli+N+Ess:      vällin
    välli+N+Pl+Nom:   väälih
    välli+N+Pl+Gen:  [vaalij, valij]
    välli+N+Pl+Acc:   vaalijd
    välli+N+Pl+Ill:   vallijd
    välli+N+Pl+Loc:   vaalijn
    välli+N+Pl+Com:   valijguin
    välli+N+Pl+Abe:   valijttáá

  Noun - päddi:
    päddi+N+Sg+Nom:   päddi
    päddi+N+Sg+Gen:   päädi
    päddi+N+Sg+Ill:   páádán
    päddi+N+Sg+Loc:   päädist
    päddi+N+Sg+Com:   paddijn
    päddi+N+Sg+Abe:   pädittáá
    päddi+N+Ess:      päddin
    päddi+N+Pl+Nom:   päädih
    päddi+N+Pl+Gen:  [paadij, padij]
    päddi+N+Pl+Acc:   paadijd
    päddi+N+Pl+Ill:   paddijd
    päddi+N+Pl+Loc:   paadijn
    päddi+N+Pl+Com:   padijguin
    päddi+N+Pl+Abe:   padijttáá

  Noun - päkki:
    päkki+N+Sg+Nom:   päkki
    päkki+N+Sg+Gen:   päähi
    päkki+N+Sg+Ill:   páákán
    päkki+N+Sg+Loc:   päähist
    päkki+N+Sg+Com:   pahhijn
    päkki+N+Sg+Abe:   pähittáá
    päkki+N+Ess:      päkkin
    päkki+N+Pl+Nom:   päähih
    päkki+N+Pl+Gen:  [paahij, pahij]
    päkki+N+Pl+Acc:   paahijd
    päkki+N+Pl+Ill:   pahhijd
    päkki+N+Pl+Loc:   paahijn
    päkki+N+Pl+Com:   pahijguin
    päkki+N+Pl+Abe:   pahijttáá

  Noun - mecci:
    mecci+N+Sg+Nom:   mecci
    mecci+N+Sg+Gen:   meeci
    mecci+N+Sg+Ill:   miäcán
    mecci+N+Sg+Loc:   meecist
    mecci+N+Sg+Com:   meccijn
    mecci+N+Sg+Abe:   mecittáá
    mecci+N+Ess:      meccin
    mecci+N+Pl+Nom:   meecih
    mecci+N+Pl+Gen:  [meecij, mecij]
    mecci+N+Pl+Acc:   meecijd
    mecci+N+Pl+Ill:   meccijd
    mecci+N+Pl+Loc:   meecijn
    mecci+N+Pl+Com:   mecijguin
    mecci+N+Pl+Abe:   mecijttáá

  Noun - mätki:
    mätki+N+Sg+Nom:   mätki
    mätki+N+Sg+Gen:   määđhi
    mätki+N+Sg+Ill:   máátkán
    mätki+N+Sg+Loc:   määđhist
    mätki+N+Sg+Com:   mađhijn
    mätki+N+Sg+Abe:   mäđhittáá
    mätki+N+Ess:      mätkin
    mätki+N+Pl+Nom:   määđhih
    mätki+N+Pl+Gen:  [maađhij, mađhij]
    mätki+N+Pl+Acc:   maađhijd
    mätki+N+Pl+Ill:   mađhijd
    mätki+N+Pl+Loc:   maađhijn
    mätki+N+Pl+Com:   mađhijguin
    mätki+N+Pl+Abe:   mađhijttáá

  Noun - pähti:
    pähti+N+Sg+Nom:   pähti
    pähti+N+Sg+Gen:   päävti
    pähti+N+Sg+Ill:   pááhtán
    pähti+N+Sg+Loc:   päävtist
    pähti+N+Sg+Com:   pavttijn
    pähti+N+Sg+Abe:   pävtittáá
    pähti+N+Ess:      pähtin
    pähti+N+Pl+Nom:   päävtih
    pähti+N+Pl+Gen:  [paavtij, pavtij]
    pähti+N+Pl+Acc:   paavtijd
    pähti+N+Pl+Ill:   pavttijd
    pähti+N+Pl+Loc:   paavtijn
    pähti+N+Pl+Com:   pavtijguin
    pähti+N+Pl+Abe:   pavtijttáá

  Noun - tähti:
    tähti+N+Sg+Nom:   tähti
    tähti+N+Sg+Gen:   täävti
    tähti+N+Sg+Ill:   tááhtán
    tähti+N+Sg+Loc:   täävtist
    tähti+N+Sg+Com:   tavttijn
    tähti+N+Sg+Abe:   tävtittáá
    tähti+N+Ess:      tähtin
    tähti+N+Pl+Nom:   täävtih
    tähti+N+Pl+Gen:  [taavtij, tavtij]
    tähti+N+Pl+Acc:   taavtijd
    tähti+N+Pl+Ill:   tavttijd
    tähti+N+Pl+Loc:   taavtijn
    tähti+N+Pl+Com:   tavtijguin
    tähti+N+Pl+Abe:   tavtijttáá

  Noun - rahti:
    rahti+N+Sg+Nom:   rahti
    rahti+N+Sg+Gen:   raahti
    rahti+N+Sg+Ill:   raahtin
    rahti+N+Sg+Loc:   raahtist
    rahti+N+Sg+Com:   rahtijn
    rahti+N+Sg+Abe:   rahtittáá
    rahti+N+Ess:      rahtin
    rahti+N+Pl+Nom:   raahtih
    rahti+N+Pl+Gen:  [raahtij, rahtij]
    rahti+N+Pl+Acc:   raahtijd
    rahti+N+Pl+Ill:   rahtijd
    rahti+N+Pl+Loc:   rahtijn
    rahti+N+Pl+Com:   rahtijguin
    rahti+N+Pl+Abe:   rahtijttáá

  Noun - tatti:
    tatti+N+Sg+Nom:   tatti
    tatti+N+Sg+Gen:   taati
    tatti+N+Sg+Ill:   taatin
    tatti+N+Sg+Loc:   taatist
    tatti+N+Sg+Com:   tattijn
    tatti+N+Sg+Abe:   tatittáá
    tatti+N+Ess:      tattin
    tatti+N+Pl+Nom:   taatih
    tatti+N+Pl+Gen:  [taatij, tatij]
    tatti+N+Pl+Acc:   taatijd
    tatti+N+Pl+Ill:   tattijd
    tatti+N+Pl+Loc:   taatijn
    tatti+N+Pl+Com:   tatijguin
    tatti+N+Pl+Abe:   tatijttáá

  Noun - veerdi:
    veerdi+N+Sg+Nom:   veerdi
    veerdi+N+Sg+Gen:   veerdi
    veerdi+N+Sg+Ill:   viärdán
    veerdi+N+Sg+Loc:   veerdist
    veerdi+N+Sg+Com:   verdijn
    veerdi+N+Sg+Abe:   verdittáá
    veerdi+N+Ess:      veerdin
    veerdi+N+Pl+Nom:   veerdih
    veerdi+N+Pl+Gen:  [veerdij, verdij]
    veerdi+N+Pl+Acc:   veerdijd
    veerdi+N+Pl+Ill:   verdijd
    veerdi+N+Pl+Loc:   veerdijn
    veerdi+N+Pl+Com:   verdijguin
    veerdi+N+Pl+Abe:   verdijttáá

  Noun - peldi:
    peldi+N+Sg+Nom:   peldi
    peldi+N+Sg+Gen:   peeldi
    peldi+N+Sg+Ill:   peeldin
    peldi+N+Sg+Loc:   peeldist
    peldi+N+Sg+Com:   peldijn
    peldi+N+Sg+Abe:   peldittáá
    peldi+N+Ess:      peldin
    peldi+N+Pl+Nom:   peeldih
    peldi+N+Pl+Gen:  [peeldij, peldij]
    peldi+N+Pl+Acc:   peeldijd
    peldi+N+Pl+Ill:   peldijd
    peldi+N+Pl+Loc:   peeldijn
    peldi+N+Pl+Com:   peldijguin
    peldi+N+Pl+Abe:   peldijttáá

  Noun - stovli:
    stovli+N+Sg+Nom:   stovli
    stovli+N+Sg+Gen:   stoovli
    stovli+N+Sg+Ill:   stoovlin
    stovli+N+Sg+Loc:   stoovlist
    stovli+N+Sg+Com:   stovlijn
    stovli+N+Sg+Abe:   stovlittáá
    stovli+N+Ess:      stovlin
    stovli+N+Pl+Nom:   stoovlih
    stovli+N+Pl+Gen:  [stoovlij, stovlij]
    stovli+N+Pl+Acc:   stoovlijd
    stovli+N+Pl+Ill:   stovlijd
    stovli+N+Pl+Loc:   stoovlijn
    stovli+N+Pl+Com:   stovlijguin
    stovli+N+Pl+Abe:   stovlijttáá

  Noun - čielgi:
    čielgi+N+Sg+Nom:   čielgi
    čielgi+N+Sg+Gen:   čielgi
    čielgi+N+Sg+Ill:   čiälgán
    čielgi+N+Sg+Loc:   čielgist
    čielgi+N+Sg+Com:   čielgijn
    čielgi+N+Sg+Abe:   čielgittáá
    čielgi+N+Ess:      čielgin
    čielgi+N+Pl+Nom:   čielgih
    čielgi+N+Pl+Gen:  [čielgij, čielgij]
    čielgi+N+Pl+Acc:   čielgijd
    čielgi+N+Pl+Ill:   čielgijd
    čielgi+N+Pl+Loc:   čielgijn
    čielgi+N+Pl+Com:   čielgijguin
    čielgi+N+Pl+Abe:   čielgiittáá

  Noun - siergi:
    siergi+N+Sg+Nom:   siergi
    siergi+N+Sg+Gen:   siergi
    siergi+N+Sg+Ill:   siärgán
    siergi+N+Sg+Loc:   siergist
    siergi+N+Sg+Com:   siergijn
    siergi+N+Sg+Abe:   siergittáá
    siergi+N+Ess:      siergin
    siergi+N+Pl+Nom:   siergih
    siergi+N+Pl+Gen:  [siergij, siergij]
    siergi+N+Pl+Acc:   siergijd
    siergi+N+Pl+Ill:   siergijd
    siergi+N+Pl+Loc:   siergijn
    siergi+N+Pl+Com:   siergijguin
    siergi+N+Pl+Abe:   siergijttáá

  Noun - äitti:
    äitti+N+Sg+Nom:   äitti
    äitti+N+Sg+Gen:   ääiti
    äitti+N+Sg+Ill:   ááitán
    äitti+N+Sg+Loc:   ääitist
    äitti+N+Sg+Com:   aittijn
    äitti+N+Sg+Abe:   Äitittáá
    äitti+N+Ess:      äittin
    äitti+N+Pl+Nom:   ääitih
    äitti+N+Pl+Gen:  [aaitij, Aitij]
    äitti+N+Pl+Acc:   aaitijd
    äitti+N+Pl+Ill:   aittijd
    äitti+N+Pl+Loc:   aaitijn
    äitti+N+Pl+Com:   Aitijguin
    äitti+N+Pl+Abe:   Aitijttáá

  Noun - sältti:
    sältti+N+Sg+Nom:   sältti
    sältti+N+Sg+Gen:   säälti
    sältti+N+Sg+Ill:   sááltán
    sältti+N+Sg+Loc:   säältist
    sältti+N+Sg+Com:   salttijn
    sältti+N+Sg+Abe:   sältittáá
    sältti+N+Ess:      sälttin
    sältti+N+Pl+Nom:   säältih
    sältti+N+Pl+Gen:  [saaltij, saltij]
    sältti+N+Pl+Acc:   saaltijd
    sältti+N+Pl+Ill:   salttijd
    sältti+N+Pl+Loc:   saaltijn
    sältti+N+Pl+Com:   saltijguin
    sältti+N+Pl+Abe:   saltijttáá

  Noun - jyelgi:
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Nom:   jyelgi
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Gen:   jyelgi
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Ill:   juálgán
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Loc:   jyelgist
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Com:   juolgijn
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Abe:   jyelgittáá
    jyelgi+N+Ess:      jyelgin
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Nom:   jyelgih
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Gen:  [juolgij, juolgij]
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Acc:   juolgijd
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Ill:   juolgijd
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Loc:   juolgijn
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Com:   juolgijguin
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Abe:   juolgijttáá

  Noun - syergi:
    syergi+N+Sg+Nom:   syergi
    syergi+N+Sg+Gen:   syergi
    syergi+N+Sg+Ill:   suárgán
    syergi+N+Sg+Loc:   syergist
    syergi+N+Sg+Com:   suorgijn
    syergi+N+Sg+Abe:   syergittáá
    syergi+N+Ess:      syergin
    syergi+N+Pl+Nom:   syergih
    syergi+N+Pl+Gen:  [suorgij, suorgij]
    syergi+N+Pl+Acc:   suorgijd
    syergi+N+Pl+Ill:   suorgijd
    syergi+N+Pl+Loc:   suorgijn
    syergi+N+Pl+Com:   suorgijguin
    syergi+N+Pl+Abe:   suorgijttáá

  Noun - lyevdi:
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Nom:   lyevdi
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Gen:   lyevdi
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Ill:   luávdán
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Loc:   lyevdist
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Com:   luovdijn
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Abe:   lyevdittáá
    lyevdi+N+Ess:      lyevdin
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Nom:   lyevdih
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Gen:  [luovdij, luovdij]
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Acc:   luovdijd
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Ill:   luovdijd
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Loc:   luovdijn
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Com:   luovdijguin
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Abe:   luovdijttáá

  Noun - hissi:
    hissi+N+Sg+Nom:   hissi
    hissi+N+Sg+Gen:   hiisi
    hissi+N+Sg+Ill:   hiisin
    hissi+N+Sg+Loc:   hiisist
    hissi+N+Sg+Com:   hissijn
    hissi+N+Sg+Abe:   hisittáá
    hissi+N+Ess:      hissin
    hissi+N+Pl+Nom:   hiisih
    hissi+N+Pl+Gen:  [hiisij, hisij]
    hissi+N+Pl+Acc:   hiisijd
    hissi+N+Pl+Ill:   hissijd
    hissi+N+Pl+Loc:   hiisijn
    hissi+N+Pl+Com:   hisijguin
    hissi+N+Pl+Abe:   hisijttáá
